Massachusetts, session 194th, S2967.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. As used in this act, the following words shall have the following meanings
unless the context clearly requires otherwise:
“Appurtenant structure”, any equipment, systems, parts and structures that are attached to
or pertinent to the design, operation or function of assets.
“Asset”, any common flood prevention structure and equipment that is used to control
flows of water or whose function is necessary for the proper operation of structures used to
control flows of water including, but not limited to, dams, tide gates, flood gates, solar panels
and floats.
“Cutler bridge”, the 107 Cutler highway vehicular bridge identified by the Massachusetts
Department of Transportation as bridge number R05061 located in the city of Revere and all
equipment and assets attached to the bridge that are pertinent to highway and bridge operations
including, but not limited to, 8 box culverts structurally built into the Cutler bridge and trash
of 5

racks affixed to the upstream side of the bridge for the purpose of protecting the 8 box culverts
from large debris, sediment and other build up.
“Emergency maintenance”, any immediate repairs or maintenance work necessary to
address unforeseen issues that prevent the proper operation and function of an asset.
“Flood gate”, a type of gate classified as a common flood prevention structure that, when
operating as designed, can be opened or closed to control the flow of water for Town Line brook
or Linden brook.
“Reconstruction”, any project or construction work that would: (i) disable or disrupt the
operations of an asset or appurtenant structure for more than 30 days; or (ii) require demolishing
or replacement of more than 50 per cent of the existing asset or appurtenant structure.
“Repair”, any project or construction work undertaken to return dysfunctional assets and
appurtenant structures to their intended and fully operational state; provided, however, that a
“repair” shall not disable or disrupt the operations of the assets and appurtenant structures for
more than 30 days.
“Routine maintenance”, any project or inspection work undertaken while an asset or
appurtenant structure is operating as intended or operating in a reasonably adequate manner in
which no major functions are disabled or disrupted; provided, however, that such project or
inspection shall be undertaken with the purpose of maintaining the intended functions of and
ensuring the proper operation of an asset or appurtenant structure.
“Tide gate”, a type of gate classified for the purposes of this act as a common flood
prevention structure that, when operating as designed, allows water to flow freely when the tide
of 5

sets in 1 direction but closes automatically and prevents the water from flowing in the opposite
direction.
SECTION 2. (a) All assets, appurtenant structures and other structures used to control the
flow of water at, into or out of the Town Line brook or Linden brook shall be under the care,
custody and control of the department of conservation and recreation. Such assets, appurtenant
structures or other structures shall include, but not be limited to, the tide gates attached to the 107
Cutler bridge; provided, however, that such assets, appurtenant structures or other structures
shall not include the 8 box culverts structurally built into the Cutler bridge and trash racks
affixed to the upstream side of the Cutler bridge to protect the 8 box culverts from large debris,
sediment and other buildup. The department shall be responsible for the inspections, emergency
maintenance, routine maintenance, reconstruction and repairs to the assets and appurtenant
structures.
(b) The department of conservation and recreation shall: (i) not less than least twice
annually, conduct routine maintenance and inspections of the assets and appurtenant structures
identified in subsection (a) to identify any damage, wear and tear or loss of functionality of the
structures; (ii) be responsible for and conduct any routine maintenance on the assets and
appurtenant structures identified in said subsection (a), as required, to ensure that they are
functioning properly; and (iii) conduct any routine repairs, reconstruction and emergency repairs
on the structures identified in said subsection (a), as required, to ensure that they are functioning
properly.
of 5

(c) The department of conservation and recreation shall be responsible for the costs of the
routine maintenance, repairs, reconstructions, inspections and emergency repairs for the assets
and appurtenant structures identified in subsection (a).
(d) The department of conservation and recreation shall report the results of any
inspection conducted pursuant to subsection (b) to the Massachusetts Department of
Transportation, the mayor and the president of the city council in the city of Malden, the mayor
and the president of the city council in the city of Revere and the mayor and the president of the
city council in the city of Everett not more than 90 days after any inspection.
(e) The department of conservation and recreation shall notify the mayor and the
president of the city council in the city of Malden, the mayor and the president of the city council
in the city of Revere and the mayor and the president of the city council in the city of Everett in
writing of any maintenance or repair undertaken pursuant to subsection (b).
(f) The department of conservation and recreation shall permit elected officials and
employees of the cities of Malden, Revere and Everett to observe the inspections, routine
maintenance, repairs, reconstruction and emergency repairs undertaken pursuant to subsection
(b).
SECTION 3. (a) The Cutler bridge shall be under the care, custody and control of the
Massachusetts Department of Transportation. For the purposes of this act, all equipment, and
attachments necessary for the operation of the Cutler bridge including, but not limited to, the 8
box culverts structurally built into the Cutler bridge and trash racks affixed to the upstream side
of the Cutler bridge shall be under the care, custody and control of the department. The
of 5

department shall be responsible for the inspections, emergency maintenance, routine
maintenance, reconstruction and repairs to the assets and appurtenant structures.
(b) The Massachusetts Department of Transportation shall: (i) not less than twice
annually, conduct routine maintenance and visual inspections of the Cutler bridge and any
structures identified in subsection (a) to identify any damage, wear and tear or loss of
functionality of the structures; (ii) conduct any routine maintenance on the Cutler bridge and
structures identified in said subsection (a), as required, to ensure that they are functioning
properly; and (iii) be responsible for and shall conduct any routine repairs, reconstruction and
emergency repairs on the Cutler bridge and structures identified in said subsection (a), as
required, to ensure that they are functioning properly.
(c) The Massachusetts Department of Transportation shall be responsible for the costs of
the routine maintenance, repairs, reconstructions, inspections and emergency repairs of the
Cutler bridge and any structures identified in subsection (a).
(d) Subject to existing permitting requirements, the Massachusetts Department of
Transportation shall permit personnel of the department of conservation and recreation to pass on
and over the Cutler bridge and other property owned by the Massachusetts Department of
Transportation as reasonably necessary to access the assets and appurtenant structures identified
in section 2 to carry out the requirements of this act.
(e) The department of conservation and recreation shall coordinate with and assist the
Massachusetts Department of Transportation to provide access through the flood gates to
complete the formal bridge inspections and repairs to the assets and appurtenant structures
identified in this section.
of 5